Illinois, session 104th, HB4216.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Section 523-7 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/23-7)  (from Ch. 122, par. 23-7)7    Sec. 23-7. Compensation and expenses. No school board 8member shall receive any compensation for service rendered to 9any such association, whether as an officer or otherwise, but 10shall be entitled to reimbursement for expenses actually 11incurred in the work of such association. Consistent with 12Section 10-15 of the State Officials and Employees Ethics Act, 13a school board association may offer and provide scholarships 14or other reimbursements to school board members and a school 15board member may receive a scholarship or other reimbursement 16from the association for reasonable travel and lodging 17expenses to attend meetings or other events hosted by the 18association that are reasonably related to the school board 19member's duties and will contribute to the professional 20development of the school board member. 21(Source: Laws 1961, p. 31.) 22    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon   HB4216- 2 -LRB104 16421 LNS 29811 b1becoming law.